Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.070

Substation or places of transfer license fee.

Any rendering plant operator or independent collector that operates substations or places of transfer shall secure from the director an annual substation license or place of transfer license and pay an annual fee of twenty-five dollars for each substation or place of transfer.

[ 1949 c 100 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-7.]